California, session 20252026, SB899.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment has published several studies that consistently indicated that exposure to wildfire PM 2.5 increased the risk of emergency room visits and hospital admissions related to respiratory issues, particularly among people of color, elderly populations, outdoor workers, children, and other vulnerable populations. (2) Rural and tribal populations, who are generally physically closest to wildfires, often lack resources such as easy access to health care, food and emergency supply centers, and multiple means of transportation that can help them escape fire more quickly.(3) Findings suggested that PM 2.5 during the wildfire periods may contain more toxic chemical constituents than during nonwildfire periods. For instance, wildfire often straddles the wildland-urban interface, meaning plastics, finished wood products, and other human-made materials from homes can burn and let off volatile organic compounds that are especially toxic to humans. (4) According to the Bay Area Council, wildfires across California in 2018 produced $7,800,000,000 in estimated health costs in the San Francisco Bay area, a rise in hospital admissions, and an increase in polluted air.(5) According to the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Task Force, by some measures, increased wildfire smoke has reversed gains in air quality created by improved emission standards in transportation and other sectors in parts of California. Evidence also suggests that smoke’s public health effects are even more significant than the tragic burns and deaths caused directly by wildfire in California.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to better understand the health costs and impacts associated with wildfire smoke to better value the importance of investing in achievement of the California Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan goals established pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 4770) of Chapter 10 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code. SEC. 2. Section 4772 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 4771.6, to read:4772. (a) On or before July 1, 2028, the task force, in cooperation with the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment Assessment, the State Air Resources Board, and the State Department of Public Health, shall assess the health costs and impacts of wildfire smoke using existing wildfire smoke and health data, including, but not limited to, data from local, state, federal, and academic sources. In developing the assessment, the task force shall do all of the following:(1) Estimate the number of emergency room visits and deaths from the smoke of wildfires in California since July 1, 2018.(2) Develop a cost estimate for the health care costs of the smoke of wildfires in California since July 1, 2018. (3) Develop a model to determine the approximate health benefits, both for cost and human health impacts, of achieving the goals identified in the state’s “Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan.” (4) Make recommendations on how the “Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan” can increase its health benefits. (b) The task force may enter into contracts with an independent group to assist with the assessment required pursuant to subdivision (a). (c) The task force shall include the assessment required in subdivision (a) and additional actions to reduce the health impact of wildfire smoke in the first update, pursuant to Section 4771, to the state’s “Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan” that occurs after the completion of the assessment.